test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v2_assuut_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - assuut - ok : # Verb 'to live' - ei tsekattu!
     assuut+V+Inf: assuut
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: asun
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: asut
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: assuu
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: asuma
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: asutta
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: asuthaan
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: asuin
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: asuit
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: asui
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: asuima
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: asuitta
     assuut+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: asuthiin
     assuut+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: asunu
     assuut+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: asuttu
     assuut+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: asunheet
     assuut+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: assuuva
     assuut+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: assuuvat
     assuut+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: asuttava
     assuut+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: asuttavat
  
     assuut+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: asuisin
     assuut+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: asuisit
     assuut+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: asuis
     assuut+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: asuisimma
     assuut+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: asuisitta
     assuut+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: asuttais
     assuut+V+Pass+Cond: asuttais
  
     assuut+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: asu
     assuut+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: asukkaa
     
     assuut+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: asumassa
     assuut+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: asumasta
     assuut+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: asumhaan
     assuut+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: asumalla
     assuut+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: asumatta
